Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-302.01
Officers; election; qualifications; term.

In any city of the first class except any city having adopted the commissioner or city manager plan of government, the mayor and city council members shall be registered voters of the city and the city council members shall be residents of the ward from which elected if elected by ward and residents of the city if elected at large. The city council may also, by a two-thirds vote of its members, provide by ordinance for the election of the treasurer and clerk. All nominations and elections of such officers shall be held as provided in the Election Act. The terms of office of all such members shall commence on the first regular meeting of the city council in December following their election.

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 3, p. 933;

Laws 1973, LB 558, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 323, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 688, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 201, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 421, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 22;

Laws 1981, LB 446, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 41;

Laws 1983, LB 308, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 957, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 853, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 485;

Laws 2001, LB 730, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 49.
July 21, 2016
City council, election, see section 32-534.

Election Act, see section 32-101.

Vacancies, see sections 32-568 and 32-569.